Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 92
INSTITUTIONS - CHARGES FOR PATIENTS

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2010 containing provisions of article 12 of this title. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

27-92-101. Liability.

When a person is admitted, committed, or transferred to a public institution of this state supervised by the department of human services for the care, support, maintenance, education, or treatment of persons with mental health disorders, the person, his or her spouse, and his or her parents are liable for the costs of his or her care, support, maintenance, and treatment to the extent and in the manner provided in this article 92. No other relatives of the person are liable to any extent for such costs.

This article 92 also applies to those persons received pursuant to article 8 of title 16 and sections 16-13-216, 19-2.5-1525, and 19-2.5-1532, but not by way of exclusion.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 771, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1376, § 295, effective May 25.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 751, § 136, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-12-101 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-92-102. Cost determination.

The department of human services shall periodically determine the individual cost for the care, support, maintenance, treatment, and education of the patients of each of the public institutions supervised by the department of human services. In making the determination, it is proper for the department to use averaging methods to the extent that it is not practicable, in the judgment of the executive director of the department of human services, to compute the actual cost for each patient.

With respect to a resident patient who is under the age of twenty-one years, the department of human services shall deduct from the determined cost an amount equal to the average per capita cost for the education of children with disabilities pursuant to article 20 of title 22, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 771, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-12-102 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-92-103. Extent of liability.

The department of human services shall assess against the patient, spouse, or parents made liable by section 27-92-101, or any of them, all or such part of the cost as they are respectively able to pay, but the department of human services shall not assess against the liable persons in the aggregate more than the whole of such cost.

The liability of each parent shall cease when such parent has completed the payments as assessed in this article or upon the patient's eighteenth birthday, whichever event first occurs.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 771, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2011:

(2) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1172, § 83, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-12-103 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-92-104. Determination of ability to pay.

All insurance and other benefits payable for the care, support, maintenance, and treatment of a patient shall be considered available for payment of the cost determined under section 27-92-102.

The department of human services shall determine the ability of a patient and his or her spouse to pay the balance of the cost by consideration of the following factors: Income reportable under Colorado law; the age of the patient and spouse; the number of dependents, their ages, and their mental and physical condition; provision for retirement years; the length of the patient's care or treatment; liabilities; and assets. The determination shall be made according to schedules contained in published rules, adopted in accordance with the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

If it is determined that the patient and his or her spouse are unable to pay the entire cost determined under section 27-92-102 and the length of the patient's care and treatment at a state institution is reasonably anticipated to be less than six months, the department of human services shall determine the parent's ability to pay by consideration of the same factors referred to in subsection (2) of this section, applying each such factor to the parent.

If it is determined that the patient and his or her spouse are unable to pay the entire cost determined under section 27-92-102 and the length of the patient's care and treatment at a state institution is reasonably anticipated to exceed six months, the department of human services shall determine the parent's ability to pay by reference to the parent's net taxable income reportable under Colorado law and to the patient's length of care or treatment. At the request of the parent, the department shall also consider other factors relevant to the interest of avoiding undue hardship to the family unit. Other factors may include the parent's age, provision for retirement years, assets, liabilities, and the number of dependents, their mental and physical condition, and their educational requirements. The determination shall be made according to schedules contained in published rules adopted in accordance with the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Should any parent not file a Colorado income tax return, the parent's net Colorado taxable income equivalent shall be determined by reference to his or her United States income tax return as though all the income disclosed by that return had been derived from sources within Colorado, and the table of rates shall be applied to the net taxable income equivalent.

Upon the willful failure of any patient, spouse, or parent to furnish to the department of human services, upon request, copies of his or her income tax returns, he or she shall be deemed to have the ability to pay the entire cost determined under this article.

Every agency and department of the state is required to render all reasonable assistance to the executive director of the department of human services in obtaining all information necessary for proper implementation of the purposes of this article. Nothing in this subsection (7) shall be construed to require the department of revenue to produce a copy of any person's income tax return solely upon the request of the department of human services, but the department of revenue shall deliver a copy of any such return upon the request of the taxpayer or his or her duly authorized representative, pursuant to section 39-21-113 (4), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 772, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-12-104 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-92-105. Effect of determination.

A determination of the ability of a patient, spouse, or parent to pay shall remain in effect until a redetermination is made.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 773, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-12-105 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-92-106. Appeal.

Appeals from the determination of the ability of a patient or relative to pay, as provided in this article, may be taken to any court of record in Colorado having jurisdiction of the patient or his or her spouse or parents liable for payment; but no appeal may be taken until the executive director of the department of human services has ruled upon a written request for a review of the determination. The request shall be made within sixty days after receipt of notification of the determination, and the applicant shall be notified of the decision of the executive director within forty-five days after the receipt of the applicant's request for review.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 773, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-12-106 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-92-107. Service.

Service of any notification, information, or request for information, review, or redetermination, accomplished by certified mail, return receipt requested, or in any manner provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure, shall be sufficient for all purposes of this article.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 773, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-12-107 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-92-108. Certificate - prima facie evidence.

In any action or proceeding to enforce the claims of the state provided for in this article, a certificate by the chief administrative officer of the institution involved or the executive director of the department of human services as to any fact or matter necessary to the establishment of the claim which is a matter of record in the institution or in the department of human services shall constitute prima facie evidence.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 773, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-12-108 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-92-109. Further actions.

A patient, spouse, or parent liable by this article who fails to pay the amounts assessed pursuant to this article shall be proceeded against in any manner authorized by law for the collection of sums due and owing to the state of Colorado.

All property of persons liable pursuant to this article shall be subject to application to claims irrespective of its origin, composition, or source subject to the exemptions set forth in section 13-54-102, C.R.S.

Claims against responsible relatives in other states may be enforced as claims for support under the provisions of the "Uniform Interstate Family Support Act", article 5 of title 14, C.R.S.

In the absence of fraud, the patient, spouse, and parents shall be liable only to the extent of assessments actually made against them respectively in accordance with this article.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 773, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-12-109 as it existed prior to 2010.